District of Columbia statutes.
31-2502.42

Violations of provisions.

(a)

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or fails to comply with any duty imposed upon such person by any of the provisions of this chapter, for which violation or failure no penalty is elsewhere provided by this chapter, or by the laws of the District, shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined for each offense not exceeding $1,000 or be imprisoned for not more than 12 months, or both. Prosecutions authorized by this section shall be upon information filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia by the Corporation Counsel or any of his assistants.

(b)

Civil fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter, or any rules or regulations issued under the authority of this chapter, pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1082, ch. 792, ch. II, § 43
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 447(c), 32 DCR 4450
Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-237, § 2(r)(3), 38 DCR 314
Violation of credit life, accident, and health insurance provisions, penalties, see § 31-5111.
This section is referenced in § 31-1103 and § 31-5111.
1981 Ed., § 35-1546.
1973 Ed., § 35-1347.